Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.215

Antitrust revolving fund—Created—Contents.

There is hereby created the antitrust revolving fund in the custody of the state treasurer which shall consist of: Funds appropriated to the revolving fund, funds transferred to the revolving fund pursuant to a court order or judgment in an antitrust action; gifts or grants made to the revolving fund; and funds awarded to the state or any agency thereof for the recovery of costs and attorney fees in an antitrust action: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That to the extent that such costs constitute reimbursement for expenses directly paid from constitutionally dedicated funds, such recoveries shall be transferred to the constitutionally dedicated fund.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 162 s 2.]